Utah statutes.
19-8-114.   Additional permits not required.
(1)  Response action conducted as part of a voluntary cleanup agreement under
this chapter does not require a state or local environmental permit, except as
required by a program delegated to the state by the federal government under
this title.
(2)  The department shall by rule require that the applicant conducting the
voluntary cleanup under this chapter comply with any federal or state
standard, requirement, criterion, or limitation to which the response action
would otherwise be subject if a permit were required.
